Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6313
Violations; action to enjoin.

The Attorney General may institute an action in the name of the state for an injunction or other process against any business entity or individual to restrain or prevent any violation of the Asbestos Control Act or of any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such act.

Laws 1986, LB 1051, § 13;

Laws 1988, LB 1073, § 11;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1256.